Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4027.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4.1, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-837.02, to read: START_STATUTE41-837.02. Charlie Kirk loop 202 A. NOTWITHSTANDING this article, the Loop 202 is designated and shall also be known as the "charlie kirk Loop 202". B. All official acts, state records, documents and papers relating to the loop 202 after the effective date of this section shall include the designation "Charlie Kirk Loop 202". C. The department of transportation shall erect a reasonable amount of signage throughout loop 202 that includes the new DESIGNATION. D. This section is not intended to supersede any current designation ASSIGNED to the loop 202 by the board. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative intent The legislature intends: 1. To rename the entire Loop 202 as the Charlie Kirk Loop 202. 2. That the underlying segments of the Charlie Kirk Loop 202 would retain their names and designations and those underlying segments are the Red Mountain Freeway, the Santan Freeway and the Congressman Ed Pastor Freeway.